Maryland, session 2026, SB0789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
(a) The Motor Vehicle Administration shall study the repair of advanced driver
assistance systems and make recommendations on the feasibility of legislation related to
the repair of advanced driver assistance systems and training requirements for advanced
driver assistance systems.
(b) The study shall include research on:
(1) existing Maryland statutes and regulations on the repair of advanced
driver assistance systems;
(2) existing laws and regulations in other states on advanced driver
assistance systems;
(3) training requirements for advanced driver assistance systems; and
(4) statistics on accidents related to advanced driver assistance systems.
(c) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
Administration shall consult with representatives from:
(1) the Maryland Insurance Administration;
(2) the Maryland Automobile Dealers Association;
(3) the American Automobile Association;
(4) the property and casualty insurance industry;

SENATE BILL 789 3
(5) a national highway safety organization;
(6) a glass repair company;
(7) an automobile body shop trade association;
(8) an advanced driver assistance training company;
(9) an advanced driver assistance manufacturing company; and
(10) an advanced driver assistance systems parts company.
(d) On or before January 1, 2027, the Administration shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee and the House Economic
Matters Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 15, SUBTITLE 11 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE; OR
14–1327.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Advanced driver assistance system” means an electronic system that
uses automated technology including cameras and sensors to detect nearby obstacles and
driver errors to assist a driver in the safe operation of a motor vehicle.
(3) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning stated in Title 11 of the Transportation
Article.
(4) (I) “Motor vehicle safety glass facility” means a person that ONLY:
[(i)] 1. Repairs or replaces motor vehicle safety glass; and

SENATE BILL 789
[(ii)] 2. Provides related recalibration of an advanced driver
assistance system.
(II) “MOTOR VEHICLE SAFETY GLASS FACILITY” DOES NOT
INCLUDE AN AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN § 15–1101 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(5) “Recalibration” means the readjustment of cameras, sensors, and other
technology in an advanced driver assistance system to ensure proper working order in
accordance with motor vehicle manufacturer specifications.
(b) Before repairing or replacing motor vehicle glass, if a motor vehicle is
equipped with an advanced driver assistance system, a motor vehicle safety glass facility
shall:
(1) Inform the customer if the recalibration of an advanced driver
assistance system is required; and
(2) Provide the customer with a written statement that the work to be
performed on the motor vehicle will meet or exceed original equipment manufacturer
specifications.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a motor vehicle safety glass
facility is not limited to motor vehicle glass, tooling, equipment, or repair procedures
provided by the vehicle manufacturer.
(2) Recalibration of an advanced driver assistance system performed by a
motor vehicle safety glass facility shall meet or exceed the motor vehicle manufacturer’s
specifications.
(3) A MOTOR VEHICLE SAFETY GLASS FACILITY MAY NOT PERFORM A
RECALIBRATION OF AN ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEM UNLESS THE
MOTOR VEHICLE SAFETY GLASS FACILITY IS LICENSED BY THE MOTOR VEHICLE
ADMINISTRATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–1103 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE.
(4) A motor vehicle safety glass facility may not charge for services that are
not performed or successfully completed.
(d) A motor vehicle safety glass facility shall inform the customer if recalibration
of an advanced driver assistance system is required and is not performed or successfully
completed.
(e) (1) A violation of this section by a motor vehicle safety glass facility is:

SENATE BILL 789 5
[(1)] (I) An unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practice within the
meaning of Title 13 of this article; and
[(2)] (II) Subject to the enforcement and penalty provisions contained in
Title 13 of this article.
(2) IN ADDITION TO PENALTIES UNDER TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE, A
MOTOR VEHICLE SAFETY GLASS FACILITY THAT COMMITS THREE VIOLATIONS OF
THIS SECTION WITHIN A 3–YEAR PERIOD IS SUBJECT TO SUSPENSION OR
REVOCATION BY THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE
SAFETY GLASS FACILITY’S LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 15–1103 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
Article – Transportation
SUBTITLE 11. AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITIES.
15–1101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEM” MEANS AN ELECTRONIC
SAFETY SYSTEM THAT AIDS IN THE DRIVING PROCESS THROUGH AUTOMATED
TECHNOLOGY, INCLUDING:
(1) FORWARD COLLISION WARNING;
(2) AUTOMATIC EMERGENCY BRAKING;
(3) LANE DEPARTURE WARNING;
(4) LANE KEEPING ASSISTANCE;
(5) ADAPTIVE CRUISE CONTROL;
(6) BLIND SPOT DETECTION;
(7) REAR CROSS TRAFFIC ALERT;
(8) PARKING ASSISTANCE; AND
(9) ADAPTIVE LIGHTING.

SENATE BILL 789
(C) (1) “AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY” MEANS A FACILITY WHERE, FOR
COMPENSATION, A MALFUNCTION OF A MOTOR VEHICLE IS DIAGNOSED OR
CORRECTED.
(2) “AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY” INCLUDES A BODY SHOP.
(3) “AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A MOTOR
VEHICLE SAFETY GLASS FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN § 14–1327 OF THE COMMERCIAL
LAW ARTICLE.
(D) “ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER” MEANS THE ORIGINAL
PRODUCER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE OR MOTOR VEHICLE COMPONENT.
(E) “POSITION STATEMENT” MEANS A DOCUMENTED POLICY OR
RECOMMENDATION REGARDING THE REPAIR, MAINTENANCE, OR REPLACEMENT OF
MOTOR VEHICLE COMPONENTS, ISSUED BY AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER.
(F) “RECALIBRATION” MEANS THE PROCESS OF TESTING, MEASURING, AND
ADJUSTING ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEM COMPONENTS TO ENSURE THE
COMPONENTS FUNCTION ACCORDING TO THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER’S SPECIFICATIONS.
(G) “REPAIR PROCEDURE” MEANS THE DOCUMENTED METHODS AND
SPECIFICATIONS FOR THE REPAIR OF A MOTOR VEHICLE, ISSUED BY AN ORIGINAL
EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER.
15–1102.
(A) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(1) ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEMS:
(I) ARE INCREASINGLY COMMON IN MOTOR VEHICLES; AND
(II) PLAY A CRITICAL ROLE IN MOTOR VEHICLE SAFETY;
(2) PROPER CALIBRATION OF ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE
SYSTEM COMPONENTS IS ESSENTIAL TO ENSURE THE SYSTEMS ARE FUNCTIONING
CORRECTLY;
(3) ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER REPAIR PROCEDURES
AND POSITION STATEMENTS PROVIDE CRITICAL SAFETY GUIDELINES REGARDING
ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEMS;

SENATE BILL 789 7
(4) INDIVIDUALS AND BUSINESSES THAT PERFORM ADVANCED
DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEM CALIBRATION SERVICES MUST FOLLOW ORIGINAL
EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER REPAIR PROCEDURES AND POSITION STATEMENTS TO
ENSURE PROPER MOTOR VEHICLE REPAIR AND RESTORATION OF SAFETY
FEATURES; AND
(5) PROFESSIONAL STANDARDS AND LICENSING OF INDIVIDUALS
AND BUSINESSES THAT PERFORM ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEM
CALIBRATION SERVICES IN THE STATE ARE NEEDED.
(B) IT IS THE PURPOSE OF THIS SUBTITLE TO:
(1) ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS FOR ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE
SYSTEM CALIBRATION SERVICES;
(2) ENSURE INSURANCE COVERAGE FOR NECESSARY REPAIRS UNDER
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER REPAIR PROCEDURE AND POSITION
STATEMENTS;
(3) PROVIDE CONSUMERS WITH ESSENTIAL INFORMATION
REGARDING THE CONSUMER’S ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEMS, AND HOW
REPAIRS IMPACT THE SYSTEMS; AND
(4) CREATE STANDARDS AND LICENSING REQUIREMENTS FOR
INDIVIDUALS AND BUSINESSES THAT PERFORM ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE
SYSTEM CALIBRATION SERVICES IN THE STATE.
15–1103.
(A) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT PERFORM A RECALIBRATION ON AN
ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEM UNLESS THE PERSON IS LICENSED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) ON OR AFTER NOVEMBER 1, 2027, A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS
SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) A CIVIL PENALTY NOT TO EXCEED $5,000 PER VIOLATION;
AND
(II) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF.

SENATE BILL 789
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND
INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ON LICENSING
PROCEDURES AND REQUIREMENTS.
15–1104.
(A) AN AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY THAT PERFORMS ADVANCED DRIVER
ASSISTANCE SYSTEM RECALIBRATIONS SHALL:
(1) MAINTAIN A CONTROLLED ENVIRONMENT THAT MEETS OR
EXCEEDS ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER SPECIFICATIONS FOR
PERFORMING RECALIBRATIONS;
(2) POSSESS AND MAINTAIN TOOLS AND EQUIPMENT NEEDED FOR
RECALIBRATION THAT MEET OR EXCEED ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER
SPECIFICATIONS;
(3) HAVE ACCESS TO ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER REPAIR
PROCEDURES AND POSITION STATEMENTS; AND
(4) HOLD AND OPERATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH A LICENSE ISSUED
UNDER § 15–1103 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) AN AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY MAY NOT:
(1) WHEN A RECALIBRATION IS REQUIRED, RETURN A MOTOR
VEHICLE TO A CUSTOMER WITHOUT HAVING CALIBRATED THE ADVANCED DRIVER
ASSISTANCE SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REPAIR PROCEDURE OR POSITION
STATEMENT;
(2) IF A RECALIBRATION WAS NOT PERFORMED ACCORDING TO THE
REPAIR PROCEDURE OR POSITION STATEMENT, REPRESENT TO A CUSTOMER THAT
THE AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY PERFORMED A RECALIBRATION; OR
(3) USE METHODS, TOOLS, OR EQUIPMENT FOR RECALIBRATION
THAT DO NOT MEET OR EXCEED THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER’S
SPECIFICATIONS.
(C) AN AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY SHALL:
(1) PERFORM ALL RECALIBRATIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REPAIR PROCEDURE OR POSITION STATEMENT;

SENATE BILL 789 9
(2) CONDUCT A POSTREPAIR SCAN TO VERIFY THAT ALL ADVANCED
DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEMS ARE FUNCTIONING PROPERLY; AND
(3) KEEP A RECORD OF ALL SCANS AND RECALIBRATIONS
PERFORMED.
15–1105.
(A) BEFORE BEGINNING ANY REPAIR WORK ON A MOTOR VEHICLE
EQUIPPED WITH AN ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEM THAT REQUIRES
RECALIBRATION, AN AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY SHALL PROVIDE THE
CUSTOMER WITH A WRITTEN STATEMENT CONTAINING:
(1) AN EXPLANATION OF EACH ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE
SYSTEM IN THE VEHICLE;
(2) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEM
COMPONENT THAT MAY BE IMPACTED BY THE REPAIR;
(3) AN EXPLANATION OF THE REQUIRED RECALIBRATION;
(4) THE ESTIMATED PRICE FOR THE REQUIRED RECALIBRATION; AND
(5) THE POTENTIAL SAFETY IMPLICATIONS OF NOT PERFORMING
THE REQUIRED RECALIBRATION.
(B) ON COMPLETION OF REPAIR WORK ON A MOTOR VEHICLE EQUIPPED
WITH AN ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEM, AN AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR
FACILITY SHALL GIVE THE CUSTOMER A WRITTEN STATEMENT THAT INCLUDES:
(1) DOCUMENTATION OF ALL DIAGNOSTIC SCANS;
(2) DOCUMENTATION OF ANY RECALIBRATION PERFORMED AND
METHODS USED TO PERFORM THE RECALIBRATION;
(3) VERIFICATION THAT ALL ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE
SYSTEMS ARE FUNCTIONING PROPERLY;
(4) CONFIRMATION THAT ALL PREREQUISITE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER RECALIBRATION REQUIREMENTS WERE MET; AND
(5) INSTRUCTIONS FOR THE MONITORING OF AN ADVANCED DRIVER
ASSISTANCE SYSTEM TO ENSURE PROPER FUNCTIONING OF THE SYSTEM.

SENATE BILL 789
15–1106.
(A) AN INSURANCE COMPANY MAY NOT:
(1) DENY COVERAGE FOR ANY REPAIR OR RECALIBRATION THAT IS
RECOMMENDED BY THE REPAIR PROCEDURE OR POSITION STATEMENT;
(2) REQUIRE REPAIRS THAT CONFLICT WITH THE REPAIR
PROCEDURE OR POSITION STATEMENT; OR
(3) CONSIDER A REPAIR TO A MOTOR VEHICLE COMPLETE UNTIL AN
AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY PERFORMS ALL NECESSARY RECALIBRATIONS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE REPAIR PROCEDURE OR POSITION STATEMENT.
(B) AN INSURANCE ESTIMATE FOR MOTOR VEHICLE COLLISION REPAIRS
SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A LINE ITEM FOR:
(I) NECESSARY PREREPAIR AND POSTREPAIR DIAGNOSTIC
SCANNING; AND
(II) ALL NECESSARY RECALIBRATIONS; AND
(2) THE COST OF ALL TOOLS, EQUIPMENT, AND FACILITY
REQUIREMENTS REQUIRED TO PERFORM PROPER RECALIBRATION.
(C) AN INSURANCE COMPANY THAT VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS
SUBJECT TO DISCIPLINE BY THE MARYLAND INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION.
15–1107.
(A) A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE OCCURRING ON OR AFTER NOVEMBER
1, 2027, IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN
TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE, EXCEPT § 13–408 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 789 11
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE PENALTIES UNDER TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL
LAW ARTICLE, AN AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY THAT VIOLATES § 15–1104 OR §
15–1105 OF THIS SUBTITLE ON OR AFTER NOVEMBER 1, 2027, IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING
$1,000;
(2) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION WITHIN 3 YEARS AFTER A FIRST
VIOLATION, A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $2,500; AND
(3) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION WITHIN 3 YEARS AFTER
A FIRST VIOLATION, A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000, SUSPENSION OR
REVOCATION OF THE AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY’S LICENSE BY THE
ADMINISTRATION, OR BOTH.
15–1108.
THE ADMINISTRATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND INSURANCE
ADMINISTRATION, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SUBTITLE,
INCLUDING:
(1) STANDARDS FOR ADVANCED DRIVER ASSISTANCE SYSTEM
RECALIBRATION TRAINING PROGRAMS;
(2) AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR FACILITY INSPECTION STANDARDS; AND
(3) TECHNICAL STANDARDS FOR RECALIBRATION EQUIPMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.